Utah statutes.
4-13-5.   Enforcement -- Inspection and samples authorized -- Methods for
sampling and analysis prescribed -- Warrants.
(1)  The department shall periodically sample, inspect, analyze, and test
commercial fertilizers and soil amendments distributed within this state to
determine if they comply with this chapter.
(2)  Methods of analysis and sampling shall be in accordance with those
adopted by the department from sources such as the Association of Official
Analytical Chemists Journal.
(3)  In determining whether a commercial fertilizer or soil amendment is
deficient, the department shall be guided solely by the official sample.
(4)  The department is authorized to enter any public or private premises or
carriers during regular business hours in order to have access to commercial
fertilizers or soil amendments subject to this chapter. If admittance is
refused, the department may proceed immediately to obtain an ex parte warrant
from the nearest court of competent jurisdiction to allow entry upon the
premises for the purpose of making inspections and obtaining samples.
